Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.170

Director—Powers and duties.

The director has the following powers and duties:

(1) To adopt, amend, and repeal rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(2) To establish fees;

(3) Upon receipt of a complaint, to inspect and audit the books and records of a seller of travel. The seller of travel shall immediately make available to the director those books and records as may be requested at the seller of travel's place of business or at a location designated by the director. For that purpose, the director shall have full and free access to the office and places of business of the seller of travel during regular business hours. When ten or more complaints have been received by either the department or the attorney general on a seller of travel within a period of ninety days, the department shall inspect and audit books and records of the seller of travel; and

(4) To do all things necessary to carry out the functions, powers, and duties set forth in this chapter.

[ 2002 c 86 s 279; 1999 c 238 s 7; 1994 c 237 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Severability—1999 c 238: See note following RCW 19.138.030.